Idaho, session 2025, H0335.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 90, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 90
CONCEALING, HARBORING, AND SHIELDING ALIENS
18-9001. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Alien" means any person not a citizen or national of the United
States.
(2) "Organization" is as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(28), the immigra-
tion and nationality act, including but not limited to an organization, cor-
poration, company, partnership, association, trust, foundation, or fund and
includes a sole proprietorship or group of persons, whether or not incorpo-
rated, permanently or temporarily associated together for joint action on
any subject or subjects.
18-9002. PROHIBITIONS. It shall be unlawful for an organization in
this state to do any of the following:
(1) Conceal, harbor, or shield from detection, attempt to conceal, har-
bor, or shield from detection, or conspire to conceal, harbor, or shield from
detection an illegal alien in any place in this state, including any build-
ing or any means of transportation, if the organization knows or recklessly
disregards the fact that the alien has come to, has entered, or remains in the
United States in violation of federal law, including being an inadmissible
alien. The provisions of this subsection shall be interpreted as being con-
sistent with 8 U.S.C. 1324(a)(1)(A);
(2) Encourage, promote, advertise, coerce, or induce an alien to come
to or reside in this state if the organization knows or recklessly disregards
the fact that such alien's coming to, entering, or residing in the United
States is or will be in violation of federal law, including being an inadmis-
sible alien. The provisions of this subsection shall be interpreted as being
consistent with 8 U.S.C. 1324(a)(1)(A);
(3) Transport, attempt to transport, or conspire to transport in
this state an alien in furtherance of the unlawful presence of the alien in
the United States, knowing or in reckless disregard of the fact that the


alien has come to, entered, or remained in the United States in violation
of federal law, including being an inadmissible alien. Conspiracy to be
so transported shall be a violation of this subsection. The provisions
of this subsection shall be interpreted as being consistent with 8 U.S.C.
1324(a)(1)(A); or
(4) Provide, promote, or advertise shelter, financial support, or le-
gal assistance to an alien in this state if the organization knows or reck-
lessly disregards the fact that such alien's coming to, entering, or resid-
ing in the United States is or will be in violation of federal law, including
being an inadmissible alien.
18-9003. PENALTIES. (1) Any organization violating the provisions of
section 18-9002, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for each un-
lawfully present alien whose illegal presence in the United States and this
state the organization is facilitating or is attempting to facilitate.
(2) Any organization violating the provisions of section 18-9002,
Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a felony when the violation involves five (5)
or more aliens whose illegal presence in the United States and this state the
organization is facilitating or is attempting to facilitate.
(3) An organization with a prior conviction under section 18-9002,
Idaho Code, who commits a subsequent violation shall be guilty of a felony.
(4)(a) On a finding of a first violation by a court of competent juris-
diction that an organization violated section 18-9002, Idaho Code, the
court shall do the following:
(i) Direct the applicable state, county, or municipal governing
body to revoke all business licenses and permits, if such exist,
held by the organization throughout the state for a duration of
one (1) year. Upon receipt of the order, and notwithstanding any
other law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately revoke the
licenses and permits held by the organization for a duration of one
(1) year; and
(ii) Impose a fine fixed by ordinance, not to exceed the sum of
three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each offense and each unlaw-
fully present alien aided by the organization.
(b) For a subsequent violation by an organization, the court shall di-
rect the applicable state, county, or municipal governing body to per-
manently revoke all business licenses and permits, if such exist, held
by the organization throughout the state. On receipt of the order, and
notwithstanding any other law, the appropriate agencies shall immedi-
ately revoke the licenses and permits held by the organization.
(5) Any conveyance, including any vessel, vehicle, or aircraft, that
has been or is being used in the commission of a violation of section 18-9002,
Idaho Code, and the gross proceeds received by any individual or organiza-
tion using such conveyance to commit such a violation, shall be subject to
civil forfeiture under the procedures applicable under state law.
18-9004. EXCEPTIONS. (1) A law enforcement agency and its officers,
employees, and staff, and any persons or organizations hired by a law en-
forcement agency, may securely transport an alien who is unlawfully present
in the United States to any federal, state, or local detention or holding fa-


cility or to any other location required to detain such alien or to facili-
tate transfer of the alien into federal custody.
(2) Any person acting in his official capacity as a first responder may
shelter, move, or transport an alien unlawfully present in the United States
pursuant to state law when required to provide emergency services.
18-9005. ENFORCEMENT. (1) In the enforcement of this chapter, an
alien's immigration status shall be determined by verification of the
alien's immigration status with the federal government pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
1373(c).
(2) Any record that relates to the immigration status of a person is
admissible in any court of this state without further foundation or testi-
mony from a custodian of records if the record is obtained from the federal
government agency that is responsible for maintaining the record. A veri-
fication of an alien's immigration status received from the federal govern-
ment pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1373(c) shall constitute proof of that alien's sta-
tus. A court of this state shall consider only the federal government's ver-
ification in determining whether an alien is lawfully present in the United
States.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.